nb: Oppdateringsmetode: Bluetooth via mobilapp; Forhandler-/serviceoppdatering; Ingen oppdateringer; SD-/microSD-kort; Abonnementsbaserte oppdateringer; USB til PC/Mac; Wi‑Fi (nedlasting på enhet); Annet
el: Μέθοδος ενημέρωσης: Bluetooth μέσω εφαρμογής για κινητά; Ενημέρωση μέσω αντιπροσώπου/σέρβις; Καμία ενημέρωση; Κάρτα SD/microSD; Ενημερώσεις βάσει συνδρομής; USB σε PC/Mac; Wi‑Fi (λήψεις συσκευής); Άλλο
th: วิธีการอัปเดต: บลูทูธผ่านแอปมือถือ; อัปเดตผ่านดีลเลอร์/ศูนย์บริการ; ไม่มีการอัปเดต; การ์ด SD/microSD; อัปเดตตามการสมัครสมาชิก; USB ต่อเข้า PC/Mac; Wi‑Fi (ดาวน์โหลดลงอุปกรณ์); อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Metoda de actualizare: Bluetooth prin aplicație pentru mobil; Actualizare de la dealer/service; Fără actualizări; Card SD/microSD; Actualizări pe bază de abonament; USB la PC/Mac; Wi‑Fi (descărcări pe dispozitiv); Altele
fr: Mode de mise à jour: Bluetooth via appli mobile; Mise à jour par le concessionnaire/service; Aucune mise à jour; Carte SD/microSD; Mises à jour sur abonnement; USB vers PC/Mac; Wi‑Fi (téléchargements sur l’appareil); Autre
zh-CN: 更新方法: 通过移动应用使用蓝牙; 经销商/服务更新; 无更新; SD/microSD 卡; 基于订阅的更新; 使用 USB 连接到 PC/Mac; Wi-Fi（设备下载）; 其他
sk-SK: Metóda aktualizácie: Bluetooth cez mobilnú aplikáciu; Aktualizácia u predajcu/v servise; Žiadne aktualizácie; SD/microSD karta; Aktualizácie na základe predplatného; USB do PC/Mac; Wi‑Fi (sťahovanie do zariadenia); Iné
ja: 更新方法: モバイルアプリ経由のBluetooth; ディーラー/サービスでの更新; 更新なし; SD/microSDカード; サブスクリプションベースの更新; PC/MacへのUSB接続; Wi‑Fi (デバイスでのダウンロード); その他
en: Update method: Bluetooth via mobile app; Dealer/service update; No updates; SD/microSD card; Subscription-based updates; USB to PC/Mac; Wi‑Fi (device downloads); Other
pl: Metoda aktualizacji: Bluetooth przez aplikację mobilną; Aktualizacja u dealera / w serwisie; Brak aktualizacji; Karta SD/microSD; Aktualizacje w ramach subskrypcji; USB do PC/Mac; Wi‑Fi (pobieranie przez urządzenie); Inne
da: Opdateringsmetode: Bluetooth via mobilapp; Forhandler-/serviceopdatering; Ingen opdateringer; SD-/microSD-kort; Abonnementsbaserede opdateringer; USB til pc/Mac; Wi-Fi (downloads til enhed); Andet
ko: 업데이트 방법: 모바일 앱을 통한 블루투스; 딜러/서비스 업데이트; 업데이트 없음; SD/microSD 카드; 구독 기반 업데이트; PC/Mac용 USB; Wi‑Fi(장치 다운로드); 기타
hr-HR: Metoda ažuriranja: Bluetooth putem mobilne aplikacije; Ažuriranje kod trgovca / u servisu; Nema ažuriranja; SD / microSD kartica; Ažuriranja na temelju pretplate; USB na PC/Mac; Wi‑Fi (preuzimanja na uređaju); Ostalo
ru: Метод обновления: По Bluetooth через мобильное приложение; Обновление у дилера / в сервисе; Без обновлений; SD/microSD-карта; Обновления по подписке; По USB к ПК/Mac; Wi‑Fi (скачивание на устройство); Другое
fi: Päivitystapa: Bluetooth mobiilisovelluksen kautta; Jälleenmyyjän/huollon päivitys; Ei päivityksiä; SD-/microSD-kortti; Tilauspohjaiset päivitykset; USB PC/Mac -yhteydellä; Wi‑Fi (laitelataukset); Muu
nl: Update methode: Bluetooth via mobiele app; Dealer-/service-update; Geen updates; SD-/microSD-kaart; Updates via abonnement; USB naar pc/Mac; Wifi (apparaatdownloads); Anders
sl-SI: Metoda posodabljanja: Bluetooth prek mobilne aplikacije; Posodobitev pri prodajalcu/serviserju; Brez posodobitev; Kartica SD/microSD; Naročniške posodobitve; USB na PC/Mac; Wi-Fi (prenosi naprave); Drugo
tr: Güncelleme yöntemi: Mobil uygulama üzerinden Bluetooth; Bayi/servis güncellemesi; Güncelleme yok; SD/microSD kart; Abonelik tabanlı güncellemeler; PC/Mac'e USB; Wi‑Fi (cihaza indirme); Diğer
vi: Phương thức cập nhật: Bluetooth qua ứng dụng di động; Cập nhật qua đại lý/dịch vụ; Không có bản cập nhật; Thẻ SD/microSD; Cập nhật theo gói đăng ký; USB tới PC/Mac; Wi‑Fi (tải xuống trên thiết bị); Khác
es: Método de actualización: Bluetooth mediante app móvil; Actualización en concesionario/taller; Sin actualizaciones; Tarjeta SD/microSD; Actualizaciones por suscripción; USB a PC/Mac; Wi‑Fi (descargas en el dispositivo); Otro
it: Modalità di aggiornamento: Bluetooth tramite app mobile; Aggiornamento tramite rivenditore/assistenza; Nessun aggiornamento; Scheda SD/microSD; Aggiornamenti in abbonamento; Tramite USB su PC/Mac; Wi-Fi (download sul dispositivo); Altro
cs: Způsob aktualizace: Bluetooth přes mobilní aplikaci; Aktualizace u prodejce / v servisu; Žádné aktualizace; Karta SD/microSD; Aktualizace na základě předplatného; USB do PC/Macu; Wi‑Fi (stahování do zařízení); Ostatní
sv: uppdateringsmetod: Bluetooth via mobilapp; Uppdatering via återförsäljare/verkstad; Inga uppdateringar; SD-/microSD-kort; Prenumerationsbaserade uppdateringar; USB till PC/Mac; Wi‑Fi (nedladdningar till enhet); Övrigt
de: Aktualisierungsmethode: Bluetooth über mobile App; Händler-/Service-Update; Keine Updates; SD-/microSD-Karte; Abonnementbasierte Updates; USB zu PC/Mac; WLAN (Geräte-Downloads); Andere
lt-LT: Atnaujinimo metodas: „Bluetooth“ per mobiliąją programėlę; Atstovo / serviso atnaujinimas; Jokių atnaujinimų; SD / „microSD“ kortelė; Prenumeruojami atnaujinimai; USB prijungiant prie PC / „Mac“; „Wi-Fi“ (atsisiunčiama į įrenginį); Kita
bg-BG: Метод за актуализация: Bluetooth чрез мобилно приложение; Актуализация от дилър/сервиз; Без актуализации; SD/microSD карта; Актуализации с абонамент; USB към компютър (PC/Mac); Wi-Fi (изтегляния на устройството); Друг
hu: Frissítési módszer: Bluetooth mobilalkalmazáson keresztül; Márkakereskedői/szerviz frissítés; Nincsenek frissítések; SD-/microSD-kártya; Előfizetés-alapú frissítések; USB PC-hez/Mac-hez; Wi‑Fi (eszközön keresztüli letöltés); Egyéb
zh-TW: 更新方式: 透過行動應用程式以藍牙連接; 經銷商/服務廠更新; 無更新; SD/microSD 記憶卡; 訂閱制更新; 使用 USB 連接 PC/Mac; Wi‑Fi (裝置下載); 其他
pt-BR: Scanner método de atualização: Bluetooth pelo app móvel; Atualização do revendedor/serviço; Sem atualizações; Cartão SD/microSD; Atualizações por assinatura; USB para PC/Mac; Wi‑Fi (downloads no dispositivo); Outro
pt-PT: Método de atualização: Bluetooth através da app para dispositivos móveis; Atualização através do concessionário/serviço; Sem atualizações; Cartão SD/microSD; Atualizações baseadas em subscrição; USB para PC/Mac; Wi-Fi (transferências no dispositivo); Outro